Hawaii statutes.
[§155D-3] Exemption from chapter
42F. Chapter 42F shall not apply to the grants made pursuant to this
chapter, but all reimbursements shall be made only in accordance with the
standards and conditions specified in section 155D‑2. [L 2007, c 221, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next